dic/ligurian_IT.aff
FLAG long
SFX Bl Y 23
SFX Bl emmo eito . is:past_participle
SFX Bl emmo endo . is:gerund
SFX Bl 0 0 . is:present_ind_1p is:present_subj_1p
SFX Bl emmo ei . is:present_ind_2p is:present_subj_2p is:imperative_2p
SFX Bl emmo eiva/ae . is:imperfect_ind_1s is:imperfect_ind_3s
SFX Bl emmo eivi/at . is:imperfect_ind_2s is:imperfect_ind_2p
SFX Bl emmo eivimo . is:imperfect_ind_1p
SFX Bl emmo eivan . is:imperfect_ind_3p
SFX Bl emmo iò . is:future_ind_1s
SFX Bl emmo iæ/atae . is:future_ind_2s is:conditional_1s is:conditional_3s
SFX Bl emmo ià/ae . is:future_ind_3s
SFX Bl emmo iemo . is:future_ind_1p
SFX Bl emmo iei . is:future_ind_2p
SFX Bl emmo ian . is:future_ind_3p
SFX Bl emmo esse/ae . is:imperfect_subj_1s is:imperfect_subj_3s
SFX Bl emmo esci/at . is:imperfect_subj_2s is:imperfect_subj_2p
SFX Bl emmo escimo . is:imperfect_subj_1p
SFX Bl emmo essan . is:imperfect_subj_3p
SFX Bl emmo ieiva/ae . is:conditional_1s is:conditional_3s
SFX Bl emmo iësci/at . is:conditional_2s is:conditional_2p
SFX Bl emmo iëscimo . is:conditional_1p
SFX Bl emmo ieivan . is:conditional_3p
SFX Bl emmo iæn . is:conditional_3p

SFX CR Y 4
SFX CR o e/ae . is:infinitive is:present_ind_3s is:present_subj_1s is:present_subj_3s
SFX CR 0 0 . is:present_ind_1s
SFX CR o i/at . is:present_ind_2s is:present_subj_2s is:imperative_2s
SFX CR o an . is:present_ind_3p is:present_subj_3p

SFX Cr Y 23
SFX Cr emmo uo . is:past_participle
SFX Cr emmo endo . is:gerund
SFX Cr 0 0 . is:present_ind_1p is:present_subj_1p
SFX Cr emmo ei . is:present_ind_2p is:present_subj_2p is:imperative_2p
SFX Cr emmo eiva/ae . is:imperfect_ind_1s is:imperfect_ind_3s
SFX Cr emmo eivi/at . is:imperfect_ind_2s is:imperfect_ind_2p
SFX Cr emmo eivimo . is:imperfect_ind_1p
SFX Cr emmo eivan . is:imperfect_ind_3p
SFX Cr emmo iò . is:future_ind_1s
SFX Cr emmo iæ/atae . is:future_ind_2s is:conditional_1s is:conditional_3s
SFX Cr emmo ià/ae . is:future_ind_3s
SFX Cr emmo iemo . is:future_ind_1p
SFX Cr emmo iei . is:future_ind_2p
SFX Cr emmo ian . is:future_ind_3p
SFX Cr emmo esse/ae . is:imperfect_subj_1s is:imperfect_subj_3s
SFX Cr emmo esci/at . is:imperfect_subj_2s is:imperfect_subj_2p
SFX Cr emmo escimo . is:imperfect_subj_1p
SFX Cr emmo essan . is:imperfect_subj_3p
SFX Cr emmo ieiva/ae . is:conditional_1s is:conditional_3s
SFX Cr emmo iësci/at . is:conditional_2s is:conditional_2p
SFX Cr emmo iëscimo . is:conditional_1p
SFX Cr emmo ieivan . is:conditional_3p
SFX Cr emmo iæn . is:conditional_3p

SFX DR Y 4
SFX DR 0 0 . is:present_ind_1s
SFX DR o i/at . is:present_ind_2s is:present_subj_2s is:imperative_2s
SFX DR o e/ae . is:present_ind_3s is:present_subj_1s is:present_subj_3s
SFX DR o an . is:present_ind_3p is:present_subj_3p

SFX Dr Y 23
SFX Dr immo î . is:infinitive is:present_ind_2p is:present_subj_2p is:imperative_2p
SFX Dr immo io . is:past_participle
SFX Dr immo indo . is:gerund
SFX Dr 0 0 . is:present_ind_1p is:present_subj_1p
SFX Dr immo iva/ae . is:imperfect_ind_1s is:imperfect_ind_3s
SFX Dr immo ivi/at . is:imperfect_ind_2s is:imperfect_ind_2p
SFX Dr immo ivimo . is:imperfect_ind_1p
SFX Dr immo ivan . is:imperfect_ind_3p
SFX Dr immo iò . is:future_ind_1s
SFX Dr immo iæ/atae . is:future_ind_2s is:conditional_1s is:conditional_3s
SFX Dr immo ià/ae . is:future_ind_3s
SFX Dr immo iemo . is:future_ind_1p
SFX Dr immo iei . is:future_ind_2p
SFX Dr immo ian . is:future_ind_3p
SFX Dr immo isse/ae . is:imperfect_subj_1s is:imperfect_subj_3s
SFX Dr immo isci/at . is:imperfect_subj_2s is:imperfect_subj_2p
SFX Dr immo iscimo . is:imperfect_subj_1p
SFX Dr immo issan . is:imperfect_subj_3p
SFX Dr immo ieiva/ae . is:conditional_1s is:conditional_3s
SFX Dr immo iësci/at . is:conditional_2s is:conditional_2p
SFX Dr immo iëscimo . is:conditional_1p
SFX Dr immo ieivan . is:conditional_3p
SFX Dr immo iæn . is:conditional_3p

PFX at Y 1
PFX at 0 t' [aàäeéèëiìïoóòöuùü] po:clitic_pronoun

PFX ae Y 1
PFX ae 0 l' [aàäeéèëiìïoóòöuùü] po:euphonic_particle
