dic/ligurian_IT.dic
çernemmo/Cr po:verb st:çerne
çerno/CR po:verb st:çerne
inguggemmo/Bl po:verb st:ingheugge
partimmo/Dr po:verb st:partî
parto/DR po:verb st:partî
